Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF305.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATIONS; LIVESTOCK PROCESSING.new text end new text begin $1,250,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $1,250,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of agriculture for grants to facilitate the start-up, modernization, or expansion of meat, poultry, egg, and milk processing facilities. The appropriations under this section are made under the agricultural growth, research, and innovation program in Minnesota Statutes, section 41A.12. A grant awarded under this section must not exceed $200,000. Any unencumbered balance at the end of fiscal year 2027 does not cancel until June 30, 2028, and may be used for other purposes under this section. new text end